Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB33.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-FCOMPREHENSIVE SCHOOL COUNSELING SERVICESSection 1301-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Direct services." As follows:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Services that are provided face-to-face, in person or virtually with students.(2) The term includes the following:(i) Classroom instruction.(ii) Individual and group counseling for students.(iii) Responsive services on behalf of a student whose immediate personal concerns and problems put the student's academic, career or social and emotional development at risk. Responsive services include the administration of a risk-assessment.(iv) Interventions for a student who is:(A) at risk of dropping out of school; or(B) exhibiting dangerous behaviors, such as drug use, self-harm or gang activity."Indirect services." Consultations among a student, a parent or legal guardian of the student, school staff and community agencies concerning the student's academic, career or social and emotional needs."Plan." The comprehensive school counseling plan under section 1302-F."Program planning and school support." Duties that are not directly related to the plan and are absent of any direct student services or interaction."School counselor." An individual who holds a valid certificate for Elementary and Secondary School Counselor issued by the department which qualifies the individual to be employed by and working within a school entity."School entity." Any of the following:(1) A school district.(2) An intermediate unit as described in Article IX-A.20250SB0033PN0969 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(4) A cyber charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(5) A regional charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(6) An area career and technical school as described in section 1841.Section 1302-F. Comprehensive school counseling plan.(a) Authorization and purpose.-- Each school entity shall develop and implement a written comprehensive school counseling plan that ensures that student services are coordinated in a manner that provides comprehensive and developmental support to all students of the school entity.(b) Requirements generally.--A plan must:(1) Be implemented by a Pennsylvania-certified school counselor or counseling team working within each school in the school entity.(2) Utilize nationally recognized and State-recognized counselor frameworks.(3) Be reviewed annually and updated as needed by the school counselor or counseling team, in collaboration with each affected building principal as well as other stakeholders and staff of each school entity.(4) Be systemically aligned from kindergarten through grade 12 within the school entity, including transitions across schools within the school entity.(5) Include sections for each grade and building within the school entity, including student transitions between grades and buildings as well as student transition to other school entities.( 6) Be reflected in and integrated alongside the school 20250SB0033PN0969 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity's student services plan as required under 22 Pa. Code § 4.13 (relating to strategic plans) or any successor regulation.(c) Components.--A plan must contain the following:(1) A foundation component, which must include:(i) A vision statement.(ii) A mission statement.(iii) Plan goals.(2) A management component, which utilizes assessments and other data to develop, implement and evaluate the plan.(3) A delivery component, which focuses on direct services and indirect services through the implementation of the plan and which shall include:(i) A plan for each grade taught by the school entity.( ii) A plan for students with individualized education programs and other special needs.(iii) A plan for each building in the school entity, if applicable.(4) An accountability component, which ensures regular analysis of the plan.(d) Contents.--A plan must:(1) Guide students in academic pursuits, career planning and social and emotional development.(2) Follow the comprehensive school counseling program guidance provided by the department.(3) Include goals that are developed annually based on the vision and mission statements that are shared by stakeholders to ensure equitable access to opportunities for all students.20250SB0033PN0969 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Identify student needs through a multilevel school data review that includes:(i) Data analysis.(ii) Use-of-time data review.(iii) Program results data.(iv) Communication and contact with administrators, students, parents and guardians of students and stakeholders.Section 1303-F. School counselor use of time.(a) General requirement.-- Sufficient time at each school entity shall be allotted for the school entity's counselor to carry out the duties stated in the school entity's plan.(b) Direct and indirect services.--(1) A school counselor shall spend a majority, with a goal of at least 80%, of the school counselor's working time during student contact days providing direct services and indirect services to students.(2) Direct services and indirect services may be provided in collaboration with other school personnel and may include:(i) Providing academic advisement services, including:(A) Developing an individual planning system to guide a student to access and monitor the student's own academic, career and educational progress.(B) Guiding a student along the pathways to graduation.(C) Guiding a student in goal-setting experiences and course selection aligned with the student's post-secondary goals.20250SB0033PN0969 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Addressing accelerated learning opportunities.(E) Addressing academic deficits and the accessibility of resources.(F) Providing student assessment reviews, interest inventories or academic results needed to develop, review and revise a student's plan of study.(G) Providing support for students who show potential so they are more likely to engage in rigorous coursework and take advantage of post-secondary opportunities.(ii) Providing a career planning process, including:(A) Guidance in understanding the relationship between classroom performance and success in school and beyond.(B) The provision of resources to identify career interests and aptitudes to assist a student in age-appropriate college and career planning.(C) Guidance in understanding the advantages of completing career certifications and internships.(D) Interpretation of augmented, criterion-referenced or norm-referenced assessments for students and parents or guardians of students.(E) The provision of information to a parent or legal guardian of a student, such as through workshops on preparing for college, financial aid and career opportunities.(F) Encouragement to a parent or legal guardian of a student to support partnerships in the student's learning and career planning processes.20250SB0033PN0969 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Providing social and emotional skills designed to support students, including programs to:(A) P romote positive communication and relationship skills, collaboration with others and responsible decision making.(B) Improve the climate in the school entity so that all students can feel that they are in a safe and supportive environment.(C) Develop conflict-resolution skills.(D) Prevent bullying and harassment, including:(I) Training programs for school employees regarding how to recognize bullying and harassing behaviors.(II) Protocols for responding to bullying or harassment that is occurring in the school entity.(III) Strategies that support a student who is being bullied or harassed.(IV) Strategies that help a bystander speak out against bullying or harassment.(E) Address age-appropriate suicide awareness and prevention through:(I) Strategies that help identify a student who is at risk for suicide.(II) Strategies and protocols that help a student who is at risk for suicide.(III) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.(iv) Intervening with students who are at risk of dropping out of school to determine if there is a way to 20250SB0033PN0969 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 keep the students in school.(v) Providing orientation programs for new students and transferring students at each level of education.(vi) Serving as a contributing member of decision-making teams and programs, which include:(A) Teams that are convened pursuant to a student's individualized education program or 504 service agreement.(B) Multitiered System of Supports (MTSS) or Response to Intervention (RTI) teams.(C) English learner programs.(D) Parental involvement or family engagement programs.(E) Positive behavioral intervention support programs.(F) Advanced placement and gifted and talented programs.(c) Program planning and school support.--After applying subsection (b), a school counselor may spend a portion, with a goal of no more than 20%, of the school counselor's working time during student contact days performing program planning and school support.Section 1304-F. Monitoring and support.(a) Posting of plan.-- Each school entity shall be responsible for posting its plan on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website or, in the alternative, on the publicly accessible Internet website of the school entity's school district, under the category of State-required information.(b) Oversight.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, 20250SB0033PN0969 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department shall monitor each school entity to ensure implementation and compliance with this article.(c) Departmental duties.--The department shall:(1) Employ at least one individual who is certified as a school counselor.(2) Provide a multilevel system of support to school entities to assist in complying with this article.(3) Provide guidance and technical assistance to school entities to support equitable access to school counseling services.Section 1305-F. Construction.Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0033PN0969 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819